Washington statutes.
RCW 42.41.050

Exemptions.

Any local government that has adopted or adopts a program for reporting alleged improper governmental actions and adjudicating retaliation resulting from such reporting shall be exempt from this chapter if the program meets the intent of this chapter.

[ 1992 c 44 s 6.]